Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1308
Arbitrators; disqualifications.

The arbitrators shall not be employees, agents, or consultants of any party to the dispute and shall have no financial or personal interest in the result of the arbitration.

Laws 1979, LB 207, § 8.